Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.350

Purchase of additional annuity—Member contribution rate.

A member may make an additional lump sum payment at date of retirement, not to exceed the member's accumulated contributions, to purchase additional annuity. A contribution of six percent of earnable compensation is required from each member, except as provided under RCW 41.32.013.

[ 1991 c 35 s 46; 1990 c 274 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 189 s 6; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 7; 1955 c 274 s 16; 1947 c 80 s 35; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-54. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 5, part; 1939 c 86 s 5, part; 1937 c 221 s 6, part; 1931 c 115 s 4, part; 1923 c 115 s 11, part; 1917 c 163 s 10, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-6, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Findings—Effective date—Construction—1990 c 274: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 189: See note following RCW 41.50.215.

Savings—Severability—Effective date—1963 ex.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Members' retirement contributions—Payment by employer: RCW 41.04.445.